test/src/gt-norm-yamls/verb-eeredh_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - rekreeredh: # verbs on -eeredh, no tripple -eee-
    rekreeredh+V+TV+Inf: [rekreeredh, ~rekreeeredh, ~rekreradidh]
    rekreeredh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du2: [rekreereden, ~rekreeereden, rekreerijidien, ~rekreradidien]
    rekreeredh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [rekreerede, rekreerijidie, ~rekreeerede, ~rekreeerijidie, rekreerede, ~rekreradidie]
    rekreeredh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [rekreerimh, ~rekreeerimh, ~rekreradimh]
    rekreeredh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [rekreerin, ~rekreeerin, ~rekreradin]
    rekreeredh+V+TV+PrfPrc: [rekreereme, ~rekreeereme, ~rekreradamme]
    rekreeredh+V+TV+Ger: [rekreereminie, ~rekreeereminie, ~rekreredeminie]
    rekreeredh+V+TV+ConNeg: [rekreerh, ~rekreeerh, ~rekreredh]

    rekreeredh+V+TV+Der/InchL+V+PrfPrc: [rekreeregåateme, ~rekreeeregåateme]
    rekreeredh+V+TV+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [rekreeregåetieh, ~rekreeeregåetieh]
    rekreeredh+V+TV+Der/InchL+V+Ger: [rekreeregåetieminie, ~rekreeeregåetieminie]

    rekreeredh+V+TV+Der/les+A+Sg+Nom: [rekreereles, ~rekreeereles]
    rekreeredh+V+TV+Der/les+A+Sg+Ill: [rekreerelassese, ~rekreeerelassese]
    rekreeredh+V+TV+Der/les+A+Sg+Com: [rekreerelassine, ~rekreeerelassine]
    rekreeredh+V+TV+Der/les+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp/SplitR: [rekreereles-, ~rekreeereles-] # XXX Is +Cmp/Attr the correct tag?

    rekreeredh+V+TV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Inf: [rekreeresovvedh, ~rekreeeresovvedh, ~rekreradovvedh]
    rekreeredh+V+TV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [rekreeresåvva, ~rekreeeresåvva, ~rekreradåvva]
    rekreeredh+V+TV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: [rekreeresuvvien, ~rekreeeresuvvien]
    rekreeredh+V+TV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du2: [rekreeresovveden, ~rekreeeresovveden, rekreeresovvijidien]
    rekreeredh+V+TV+Der/PassL+V+IV+PrfPrc: [rekreeresovveme, ~rekreeeresovveme, ~rekreradovveme]
    rekreeredh+V+TV+Der/PassL+V+IV+ConNeg: [rekreeresovvh, ~rekreeeresovvh, ~rekreradovvh]

    rekreeredh+V+TV+Der/ldahke+N+Sg+Com: [rekreereldahkine, ~rekreeereldahkine]
    rekreeredh+V+TV+Der/lg+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [rekreerelgidie, ~rekreeerelgidie]
    rekreeredh+V+TV+Der/ahtje+V+PrfPrc: [rekreerijahtjeme, ~rekreeerijahtjeme, ~rekreradahtjeme]
    rekreeredh+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Ela: [rekreerijistie, ~rekreeerijistie, ~rekreradæjjeste]
